Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB1065.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 202(c)(2)(ii) of Title 15 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended to read:§ 202. Requirements for names generally.* * *(c) Required approvals or conditions.--* * *(2) The proper name of a covered association shall not contain:* * *[(ii) Words that constitute blasphemy, profane cursing or swearing or that profane the Lord's name.]* * *Section 2. The regulation at 19 Pa. Code § 17.5 is 12345678910111213141516171819 abrogated.Section 3. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250SB1065PN1256 - 2 - 12